New Jersey, session 221, S822.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a sign, placard, license plate, or other marker that uses a wheelchair symbol to identify for the general public accessible features designed or designated for the use of a person with a disability shall depict, in place of the wheelchair used as the international symbol of access prior to the effective date of this act, a logo with a dynamic character leaning forward with a sense of movement.  The logo shall be readily identifiable, simply designed with no secondary meaning, and provide for equivalent facilitation and accessibility as the international symbol of access.  In any instance where the word handicapped would be used on a sign, placard, license plate, or other marker, the word accessible shall be used instead. b.    This section shall apply to signs, placards, license plates, and other markers being replaced or newly installed on or after the effective date of this act, and shall not be construed to require the replacement of a sign, placard, license plate, or other marker, if replacement is not otherwise necessary or appropriate. 2.    This act shall take effect on the 60th day after the date of enactment.